North Dakota, session 69, HB1316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Two new subsections to section 39-06.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code are
created and enacted as follows:
An individual who has a temporary restricted driver's license and commits a moving traffic
violation is subject to the fee specified for the violation, plus an additional fee of one hundred
dollars.
The director shall revoke an individual's temporary restricted license if the individual commits
three moving traffic violations after being issued the temporary restricted license. A revocation
under this subsection may only last a period of thirty days.

H. B. NO. 1316 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1316.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 1 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State